Washington statutes.
RCW 9.92.900

RCW * 9.92.050 through 9.92.090 inapplicable to felonies committed on or after July 1, 1984.

The following sections of law do not apply to any felony offense committed on or after July 1, 1984: RCW * 9.92.050, 9.92.060, 9.92.062, 9.92.064, 9.92.066, 9.92.070, 9.92.080, and 9.92.090.

[ 1984 c 209 s 2; 1981 c 137 s 31.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 9.92.050 was repealed by 1992 c 7 s 64.

Effective dates—1984 c 209: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.